California statutes. Water Code
-------------------------------------------

10608.26.

(a) In complying with this part, an urban retail water supplier shall conduct at least one public hearing to accomplish all of the following:

(1) Allow community input regarding the urban retail water supplier’s implementation plan for complying with this part.

(2) Consider the economic impacts of the urban retail water supplier’s implementation plan for complying with this part.

(3) Adopt a method, pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 10608.20, for determining its urban water use target.

(b) In complying with this part, an
 urban retail water supplier may meet its urban water use target through efficiency improvements in any combination among its customer sectors. An urban retail water supplier shall avoid placing a disproportionate burden on any customer sector.

(c) For an urban retail water supplier that supplies water to a United States Department of Defense military installation, the urban retail water supplier’s implementation plan for complying with this part shall consider the conservation of that military installation under federal Executive Order 13514.

(d) (1) Any ordinance or resolution adopted by an urban retail water supplier after the effective date of this section shall not require existing customers as of the effective date of this section, to undertake changes in product formulation, operations, or equipment that would reduce process water use, but may provide
 technical assistance and financial incentives to those customers to implement efficiency measures for process water. This section shall not limit an ordinance or resolution adopted pursuant to a declaration of drought emergency by an urban retail water supplier.

(2) This part shall not be construed or enforced so as to interfere with the requirements of Chapter 4 (commencing with Section 113980) to Chapter 13 (commencing with Section 114380), inclusive, of Part 7 of Division 104 of the Health and Safety Code, or any requirement or standard for the protection of public health, public safety, or worker safety established by federal, state, or local government or recommended by recognized standard setting organizations or trade associations.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 257, Sec. 1.   (AB 2277)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.28.

(a) An urban retail water supplier may meet its urban water use target within its retail service area, or through mutual agreement, by any of the following:

(1) Through an urban wholesale water supplier.

(2) Through a regional agency authorized to plan and implement water conservation, including, but not limited to, an agency established under the Bay Area Water Supply and Conservation Agency Act (Division 31 (commencing with Section 81300)).

(3) Through a regional water management group as defined in Section 10537.

(4) By an integrated regional water management funding area.

(5) By hydrologic region.

(6) Through other appropriate geographic scales for which computation methods have been developed by the department.

(b) A regional water management group, with the written consent of its member agencies, may undertake any or all planning, reporting, and implementation functions under this chapter for the member agencies that consent to those activities. Any data or reports shall provide information both for the regional water management group and separately for each consenting urban retail water supplier and urban wholesale water supplier.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.32.

All costs incurred pursuant to this part by a water utility regulated by the Public Utilities Commission may be recoverable in rates subject to review and approval by the Public Utilities Commission, and may be recorded in a memorandum account and reviewed for reasonableness by the Public Utilities Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.34.

(a) (1) On or before January 1, 2017, the department shall adopt rules for all of the following:

(A) The conduct of standardized water loss audits by urban retail water suppliers in accordance with the method adopted by the American Water Works Association in the third edition of Water Audits and Loss Control Programs, Manual M36 and in the Free Water Audit Software, version 5.0.

(B) The process for validating a water loss audit report prior to submitting the report to the department. For the purposes of this section, “validating” is a process whereby an urban retail water supplier uses a technical expert to confirm the basis of all data entries in the urban retail water
 supplier’s water loss audit report and to appropriately characterize the quality of the reported data. The validation process shall follow the principles and terminology laid out by the American Water Works Association in the third edition of Water Audits and Loss Control Programs, Manual M36 and in the Free Water Audit Software, version 5.0. A validated water loss audit report shall include the name and technical qualifications of the person engaged for validation.

(C) The technical qualifications required of a person to engage in validation, as described in subparagraph (B).

(D) The certification requirements for a person selected by an urban retail water supplier to provide validation of its own water loss audit report.

(E) The method of submitting a water loss audit report to the department.

(2) The department shall update rules adopted pursuant to paragraph (1) no later than six months after the release of subsequent editions of the American Water Works Association’s Water Audits and Loss Control Programs, Manual M36. Except as provided by the department, until the department adopts updated rules pursuant to this paragraph, an urban retail water supplier may rely upon a subsequent edition of the American Water Works Association’s Water Audits and Loss Control Programs, Manual M36 or the Free Water Audit Software.

(b) (1) On or before October 1 of each year until October 1, 2023, each urban retail water supplier reporting on a calendar year basis shall submit a completed and validated water loss audit report for the previous calendar year or the previous fiscal year as prescribed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(2) On or before January 1 of each year until January 1, 2024, each urban retail water supplier reporting on a fiscal year basis shall submit a completed and validated water loss audit report for the previous fiscal year as prescribed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(3) On or before January 1, 2024, and on or before January 1 of each year thereafter, each urban retail water supplier shall submit a completed and validated water loss audit report for the previous calendar year or previous fiscal year as part of the report submitted to the department pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10609.24 and as prescribed by the department pursuant to subdivision (a).

(4) Water loss audit reports submitted on or before October 1, 2017, may be completed and validated with assistance as described in subdivision
 (c).

(c) Using funds available for the 2016–17 fiscal year, the board shall contribute up to four hundred thousand dollars ($400,000) towards procuring water loss audit report validation assistance for urban retail water suppliers.

(d) Each water loss audit report submitted to the department shall be accompanied by information, in a form specified by the department, identifying steps taken in the preceding year to increase the validity of data entered into the final audit, reduce the volume of apparent losses, and reduce the volume of real losses.

(e) At least one of the following employees of an urban retail water supplier shall attest to each water loss audit report submitted to the department:

(1) The chief financial officer.

(2) The chief engineer.

(3) The general manager.

(f) The department shall deem incomplete and return to the urban retail water supplier any final water loss audit report found by the department to be incomplete, not validated, unattested, or incongruent with known characteristics of water system operations. A water supplier shall resubmit a completed water loss audit report within 90 days of an audit being returned by the department.

(g) The department shall post all validated water loss audit reports on its internet website in a manner that allows for comparisons across water suppliers. The department shall make the validated water loss audit reports available for public viewing in a timely manner after their receipt.

(h) Using available funds, the department shall provide technical assistance to guide urban retail water suppliers’ water loss detection programs, including, but not limited to, metering techniques, pressure management techniques, condition-based assessment techniques for transmission and distribution pipelines, and utilization of portable and permanent water loss detection devices.

(i) No earlier than January 1, 2019, and no later than July 1, 2020, the board shall adopt rules requiring urban retail water suppliers to meet performance standards for the volume of water losses. In adopting these rules, the board shall employ full life-cycle cost accounting to evaluate the costs of meeting the performance standards. The board may consider establishing a minimum allowable water loss threshold that, if reached and maintained by an urban water supplier, would exempt the urban water
 supplier from further water loss reduction requirements.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 239, Sec. 1.   (AB 1414)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.35.

(a) The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and make a recommendation to the Legislature, by January 1, 2020, on the feasibility of developing and enacting water loss reporting requirements for urban wholesale water suppliers.

(b) The studies and investigations shall include an evaluation of the suitability of applying the processes and requirements of Section 10608.34 to urban wholesale water suppliers.

(c) In conducting necessary studies and investigations and developing its recommendation, the department shall solicit broad public
 participation from stakeholders and other interested persons.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 14, Sec. 7.   (SB 606)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.36.

Urban wholesale water suppliers shall include in the urban water management plans required pursuant to Part 2.6 (commencing with Section 10610) an assessment of their present and proposed future measures, programs, and policies to help achieve the water use reductions required by this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.40.

Urban water retail suppliers shall report to the department on their progress in meeting their urban water use targets as part of their urban water management plans submitted pursuant to Section 10631. The data shall be reported using a standardized form developed pursuant to Section 10608.52.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.42.

(a) The department shall review the 2015 urban water management plans and report to the Legislature by July 1, 2017, on progress towards achieving a 20-percent reduction in urban water use by December 31, 2020. The report shall include recommendations on changes to water efficiency standards or urban water use targets to achieve the 20-percent reduction and to reflect updated efficiency information and technology changes.

(b) A report to be submitted pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be submitted in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2014, Ch. 463, Sec. 1.   (AB 2067)   Effective January 1, 2015.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.43.

The department, in conjunction with the California Urban Water Conservation Council, by April 1, 2010, shall convene a representative task force consisting of academic experts, urban retail water suppliers, environmental organizations, commercial water users, industrial water users, and institutional water users to develop alternative best management practices for commercial, industrial, and institutional users and an assessment of the potential statewide water use efficiency improvement in the commercial, industrial, and institutional sectors that would result from implementation of these best management practices. The taskforce, in conjunction with the department, shall submit a report to the Legislature by April 1, 2012, that shall include a review of multiple sectors within
 commercial, industrial, and institutional users and that shall recommend water use efficiency standards for commercial, industrial, and institutional users among various sectors of water use. The report shall include, but not be limited to, the following:

(a) Appropriate metrics for evaluating commercial, industrial, and institutional water use.

(b) Evaluation of water demands for manufacturing processes, goods, and cooling.

(c) Evaluation of public infrastructure necessary for delivery of recycled water to the commercial, industrial, and institutional sectors.

(d) Evaluation of institutional and economic barriers to increased recycled water use within the commercial, industrial, and institutional sectors.

(e) Identification of technical feasibility and cost of the best management practices to achieve more efficient water use statewide in the commercial, industrial, and institutional sectors that is consistent with the public interest and reflects past investments in water use efficiency.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.44.

Each state agency shall reduce water use at facilities it operates to support urban retail water suppliers in meeting the target identified in Section 10608.16.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2010, Ch. 328, Sec. 235.   (SB 1330)   Effective January 1, 2011.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 4. Agricultural Water Suppliers [10608.48. - 10608.48.]

10608.48.

(a) On or before July 31, 2012, an agricultural water supplier shall implement efficient water management practices pursuant to subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) Agricultural water suppliers shall implement both of the following critical efficient management practices:

(1) Measure the volume of water delivered to customers with sufficient accuracy to comply with subdivision (a) of Section 531.10 and to implement paragraph (2).

(2) Adopt a pricing structure for water customers based at least in part on quantity delivered.

(c) Agricultural water suppliers shall implement additional efficient management practices, including, but not limited to, practices to accomplish all of the following, if the measures are locally cost effective and technically feasible:

(1) Facilitate alternative land use for lands with exceptionally high water duties or whose irrigation contributes to significant problems, including drainage.

(2) Facilitate use of available recycled water that otherwise would not be used beneficially, meets all health and safety criteria, and does not harm crops or soils.

(3) Facilitate the financing of capital improvements for on-farm irrigation systems.

(4) Implement an incentive pricing structure that promotes one or more of the following goals:

(A) More efficient water use at the farm level.

(B) Conjunctive use of groundwater.

(C) Appropriate increase of groundwater recharge.

(D) Reduction in problem drainage.

(E) Improved management of environmental resources.

(F) Effective management of all water sources throughout the year by adjusting seasonal pricing structures based on current conditions.

(5) Expand line or pipe
 distribution systems, and construct regulatory reservoirs to increase distribution system flexibility and capacity, decrease maintenance, and reduce seepage.

(6) Increase flexibility in water ordering by, and delivery to, water customers within operational limits.

(7) Construct and operate supplier spill and tailwater recovery systems.

(8) Increase planned conjunctive use of surface water and groundwater within the supplier service area.

(9) Automate canal control structures.

(10) Facilitate or promote customer pump testing and evaluation.

(11) Designate a water conservation coordinator who will develop and implement the water management plan and prepare progress reports.

(12) Provide for the availability of water management services to water users. These services may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(A) On-farm irrigation and drainage system evaluations.

(B) Normal year and real-time irrigation scheduling and crop evapotranspiration information.

(C) Surface water, groundwater, and drainage water quantity and quality data.

(D) Agricultural water management educational programs and materials for
 farmers, staff, and the public.

(13) Evaluate the policies of agencies that provide the supplier with water to identify the potential for institutional changes to allow more flexible water deliveries and storage.

(14) Evaluate and improve the efficiencies of the supplier’s pumps.

(d) Agricultural water suppliers shall include in the agricultural water management plans required pursuant to Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 10800) a report on which efficient water management practices have been implemented and are planned to be implemented, an estimate of the water use efficiency improvements that have occurred since the last report, and an estimate of the water use efficiency improvements estimated to occur five and
 10 years in the future. If an agricultural water supplier determines that an efficient water management practice is not locally cost effective or technically feasible, the supplier shall submit information documenting that determination.

(e) The department shall require information about the implementation of efficient water management practices to be reported using a standardized form developed pursuant to Section 10608.52.

(f) An agricultural water supplier may meet the requirements of subdivisions (d) and (e) by submitting to the department a water conservation plan submitted to the United States Bureau of Reclamation that meets the requirements described in Section 10828.

(g) On or before December 31, 2013,
 December 31, 2016, and December 31, 2021, the department, in consultation with the board, shall submit to the Legislature a report on the agricultural efficient water management practices that have been implemented and are planned to be implemented and an assessment of the manner in which the implementation of those efficient water management practices has affected and will affect agricultural operations, including estimated water use efficiency improvements, if any.

(h) The department may update the efficient water management
 practices required pursuant to subdivision (c), in consultation with the Agricultural Water Management Council, the United States Bureau of Reclamation, and the board. All efficient water management practices for agricultural water use pursuant to this chapter shall be adopted or revised by the department only after the department conducts public hearings to allow participation of the diverse geographical areas and interests of the state.

(i) (1) The department shall adopt regulations that provide for a range of options that agricultural water suppliers may use or implement to comply with the measurement requirement in paragraph (1) of subdivision (b).

(2) The initial adoption of a regulation authorized by this subdivision is deemed to address an
 emergency, for purposes of Sections 11346.1 and 11349.6 of the Government Code, and the department is hereby exempted for that purpose from the requirements of subdivision (b) of Section 11346.1 of the Government Code. After the initial adoption of an emergency regulation pursuant to this subdivision, the department shall not request approval from the Office of Administrative Law to readopt the regulation as an emergency regulation pursuant to Section 11346.1 of the Government Code.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 6.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 5. Sustainable Water Management [10608.50. - 10608.50.]

10608.50.

(a) The department, in consultation with the board, shall promote implementation of regional water resources management practices through increased incentives and removal of barriers consistent with state and federal law. Potential changes may include, but are not limited to, all of the following:

(1) Revisions to the requirements for urban and agricultural water management plans.

(2) Revisions to the requirements for integrated regional water management plans.

(3) Revisions to the eligibility for state water management grants and loans.

(4) Revisions to state or local permitting requirements that increase water supply opportunities, but do not weaken water quality protection under state and federal law.

(5) Increased funding for research, feasibility studies, and project construction.

(6) Expanding technical and educational support for local land use and water management agencies.

(b) No later than January 1, 2011, and updated as part of the California Water Plan, the department, in consultation with the board, and with public input, shall propose new statewide targets, or review and update existing statewide targets, for regional water resources management practices, including, but not limited to, recycled water, brackish groundwater desalination, and infiltration and direct use of urban
 stormwater runoff.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 6. Standardized Data Collection [10608.52. - 10608.52.]

10608.52.

(a) The department, in consultation with the board, the California Bay-Delta Authority or its successor agency, the State Department of Public Health, and the Public Utilities Commission, shall develop a single standardized water use reporting form to meet the water use information needs of each agency, including the needs of urban water suppliers that elect to determine and report progress toward achieving targets on a regional basis as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 10608.28.

(b) At a minimum, the form shall be developed to accommodate information sufficient to assess an urban water supplier’s compliance with conservation targets pursuant to Section 10608.24 and an agricultural water
 supplier’s compliance with implementation of efficient water management practices pursuant to subdivision (a) of Section 10608.48. The form shall accommodate reporting by urban water suppliers on an individual or regional basis as provided in subdivision (a) of Section 10608.28.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 7. Funding Provisions [10608.56. - 10608.60.]

10608.56.

(a) On and after July 1, 2016, an urban retail water supplier is not eligible for a water grant or loan awarded or administered by the state unless the supplier complies with this part.

(b) On and after July 1, 2013, an agricultural water supplier is not eligible for a water grant or loan awarded or administered by the state unless the supplier complies with this part.

(c) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall determine that an urban retail water supplier is eligible for a water grant or loan even though the supplier has not met the per capita reductions required pursuant to Section 10608.24, if the urban retail water
 supplier has submitted to the department for approval a schedule, financing plan, and budget, to be included in the grant or loan agreement, for achieving the per capita reductions. The supplier may request grant or loan funds to achieve the per capita reductions to the extent the request is consistent with the eligibility requirements applicable to the water funds.

(d) Notwithstanding subdivision (b), the department shall determine that an agricultural water supplier is eligible for a water grant or loan even though the supplier is not implementing all of the efficient water management practices described in Section 10608.48, if the agricultural water supplier has submitted to the department for approval a schedule, financing plan, and budget, to be included in the grant or loan agreement, for implementation of the efficient water management practices. The supplier may request grant or loan funds to implement the efficient water management
 practices to the extent the request is consistent with the eligibility requirements applicable to the water funds.

(e) Notwithstanding subdivision (a), the department shall determine that an urban retail water supplier is eligible for a water grant or loan even though the supplier has not met the per capita reductions required pursuant to Section 10608.24, if the urban retail water supplier has submitted to the department for approval documentation demonstrating that its entire service area qualifies as a disadvantaged community.

(f) The department shall not deny eligibility to an urban retail water supplier or agricultural water supplier in compliance with the requirements of this part and Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 10800), that is participating in a multiagency water project, or an integrated regional water management plan, developed pursuant to Section 75026 of the
 Public Resources Code, solely on the basis that one or more of the agencies participating in the project or plan is not implementing all of the requirements of this part or Part 2.8 (commencing with Section 10800).

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------

10608.60.

(a) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds made available by Section 75026 of the Public Resources Code should be expended, consistent with Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001) of the Public Resources Code and upon appropriation by the Legislature, for grants to implement this part. In the allocation of funding, it is the intent of the Legislature that the department give consideration to disadvantaged communities to assist in implementing the requirements of this part.

(b) It is the intent of the Legislature that funds made available by Section 75041 of the Public Resources Code, should be expended, consistent with Division 43 (commencing with Section 75001) of the Public Resources
 Code and upon appropriation by the Legislature, for direct expenditures to implement this part.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 8. Quantifying Agricultural Water Use Efficiency [10608.64. - 10608.64.]

10608.64.

The department, in consultation with the Agricultural Water Management Council, academic experts, and other stakeholders, shall develop a methodology for quantifying the efficiency of agricultural water use. Alternatives to be assessed shall include, but not be limited to, determination of efficiency levels based on crop type or irrigation system distribution uniformity. On or before December 31, 2011, the department shall report to the Legislature on a proposed methodology and a plan for implementation. The plan shall include the estimated implementation costs and the types of data needed to support the methodology. Nothing in this section authorizes the department to implement a methodology established pursuant to this section.

(History: Added by Stats. 2009, 7th Ex. Sess., Ch. 4, Sec. 1.   (SB 7 7x)   Effective February 3, 2010.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 9. Urban Water Use Objectives and Water Use Reporting [10609. - 10609.38.]

10609.

(a) The Legislature finds and declares that this chapter establishes a method to estimate the aggregate amount of water that would have been delivered the previous year by an urban retail water supplier if all that water had been used efficiently. This estimated aggregate water use is the urban retail water supplier’s urban water use objective. The method is based on water use efficiency standards and local service area characteristics for that year. By comparing the amount of water actually used in the previous year with the urban water use objective, local urban water suppliers will be in a better position to help eliminate unnecessary use of water; that is, water used in excess of that needed to accomplish the intended beneficial use.

(b) The Legislature further
 finds and declares all of the following:

(1) This chapter establishes standards and practices for the following water uses:

(A) Indoor residential use.

(B) Outdoor residential use.

(C) CII water use.

(D) Water losses.

(E) Other unique local uses and situations that can have a material effect on an urban water supplier’s total water use.

(2) This chapter further does all of the following:

(A) Establishes a method to calculate each urban water use objective.

(B) Considers recycled water quality in establishing efficient irrigation standards.

(C) Requires the department to provide or otherwise identify data regarding the unique local conditions to support the calculation of an urban water use objective.

(D) Provides for the use of alternative sources of data if alternative sources are shown to be as accurate as, or more accurate than, the data provided by the department.

(E) Requires annual reporting of the previous year’s water use with the urban water use objective.

(F) Provides a bonus incentive for the amount of potable recycled water used the previous year when comparing the previous year’s water use with the urban water use objective, of up to
 10 percent of the urban water use objective.

(3) This chapter requires the department and the board to solicit broad public participation from stakeholders and other interested persons in the development of the standards and the adoption of regulations pursuant to this chapter.

(4) This chapter preserves the Legislature’s authority over long-term water use efficiency target setting and ensures appropriate legislative oversight of the implementation of this chapter by doing all of the following:

(A) Requiring the Legislative Analyst to conduct a review of the implementation of this chapter, including compliance with the adopted standards and regulations, accuracy of the data, use of alternate data, and other issues the Legislative Analyst deems appropriate.

(B) Stating legislative intent that the director of the department and the chairperson of the board appear before the appropriate Senate and Assembly policy committees to report on progress in implementing this chapter.

(C) Providing one-time-only authority to the department and board to adopt water use efficiency standards, except as explicitly provided in this chapter. Authorization to update the standards shall require separate legislation.

(c) It is the intent of the Legislature that the following principles apply to the development and implementation of long-term standards and urban water use objectives:

(1) Local urban retail water suppliers should have primary responsibility for meeting standards-based water use targets, and they shall retain the flexibility to develop their water supply
 portfolios, design and implement water conservation strategies, educate their customers, and enforce their rules.

(2) Long-term standards and urban water use objectives should advance the state’s goals to mitigate and adapt to climate change.

(3) Long-term standards and urban water use objectives should acknowledge the shade, air quality, and heat-island reduction benefits provided to communities by trees through the support of water-efficient irrigation practices that keep trees healthy.

(4) The state should identify opportunities for streamlined reporting, eliminate redundant data submissions, and incentivize open access to data collected by urban and agricultural water suppliers.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2019, Ch. 497, Sec. 287.   (AB 991)   Effective January 1, 2020.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.2.

(a) The board, in coordination with the department, shall adopt long-term standards for the efficient use of water pursuant to this chapter on or before June 30, 2022.

(b) Standards shall be adopted for all of the following:

(1) Outdoor residential water use.

(2) Outdoor irrigation of landscape areas with dedicated irrigation meters in connection with CII water use.

(3) A volume for water loss.

(c) When adopting the standards
 under this section, the board shall consider the policies of this chapter and the proposed efficiency standards’ effects on local wastewater management, developed and natural parklands, and urban tree health. The standards and potential effects shall be identified by May 30, 2022. The board shall allow for public comment on potential effects identified by the board under this subdivision. 

(d) The long-term standards shall be set at a level designed so that the water use objectives, together with other demands excluded from the long-term standards such as CII indoor water use and CII outdoor water use not connected to a
 dedicated landscape meter, would exceed the statewide conservation targets required pursuant to Chapter 3 (commencing with Section 10608.16).

(e) The board, in coordination with the department, shall adopt by regulation variances recommended by the department pursuant to Section 10609.14 and guidelines and methodologies pertaining to the calculation of an urban retail water supplier’s urban water use objective recommended by the department pursuant to Section 10609.16.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.4.

(a) (1) Until January 1, 2025, the standard for indoor residential water use shall be 55 gallons per capita daily.

(2) Beginning January 1, 2025, and until January 1, 2030, the standard for indoor residential water use shall be 47 gallons per capita daily.

(3) Beginning January 1, 2030, the standard for indoor residential water use shall be 42 gallons per capita daily.

(b) (1) The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations to assess and quantify the economic benefits
 and impacts of the 2030 indoor residential use standard on water, wastewater, and recycled water systems and shall include saturation end-use studies. The studies and investigations shall build on the standards and potential effects identified pursuant to subdivision (c) of Section 10609.2 and shall also consider, and as appropriate incorporate, other regional and statewide studies that quantify the impacts on water, wastewater, and recycled water systems, and evaluate the long-term effects of telework. To facilitate these studies and investigations, the board may
 request necessary and relevant
 information from wastewater agencies, including monthly influent flow, actions taken to reassess treatment processes, and the impact of the implementation of this chapter on wastewater operations, maintenance, and capital investment. The department, in coordination with the board, shall summarize the findings of these studies and investigations in a report to the Legislature on or before October 1, 2028. The report shall be submitted
 in compliance with Section 9795 of the Government Code.

(2) If the department, in coordination with the board, determines that
 the 2030 indoor residential use standard is likely to unduly impact affordability of water and wastewater services, the department and the board may jointly recommend to the Legislature an alternate date on which the 2030 indoor residential use
 standard shall take effect. This determination shall be made using at least two years of data reflecting application of the 2025 indoor residential use standard.

(3) Based upon the studies and investigations conducted pursuant to paragraph (1), the department shall consider whether to recommend, for adoption by the board, additional variances to accommodate unique challenges related to residential indoor water use pursuant to Section 10609.2. Variance options may include, but are not limited to, stranded assets,
 impacts on disadvantaged communities, impacts to environmental flows, or adverse impacts to wastewater or recycled water operations.

(4) The studies, investigations, and report described in paragraph (1) shall include timely and inclusive collaboration with, and input from, a broad group of stakeholders, including, but not limited to, environmental groups, experts in indoor plumbing,
 water, wastewater, and recycled water agencies.

(c) An urban retail water supplier shall not be subject to enforcement pursuant to this chapter solely for failing to meet the indoor residential use standard.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2022, Ch. 679, Sec. 1.   (SB 1157)   Effective January 1, 2023.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.6.

(a) (1) The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and recommend, no later than October 1, 2021, standards for outdoor residential use for adoption by the board in accordance with this chapter.

(2) (A) The standards shall incorporate the principles of the model water efficient landscape ordinance adopted by the department pursuant to the Water Conservation in Landscaping Act (Article 10.8 (commencing with Section 65591) of Chapter 3 of Division 1 of Title 7 of the Government Code).

(B) The standards shall
 apply to irrigable lands.

(C) The standards shall include provisions for swimming pools, spas, and other water features. Ornamental water features that are artificially supplied with water, including ponds, lakes, waterfalls, and fountains, shall be analyzed separately from swimming pools and spas.

(b) The department shall, by January 1, 2021, provide each urban retail water supplier with data regarding the area of residential irrigable lands in a manner that can reasonably be applied to the standards adopted pursuant to this section.

(c) The department shall not recommend standards pursuant to this section until it has conducted pilot projects or studies, or some combination of the two, to ensure that the data provided to
 local agencies are reasonably accurate for the data’s intended uses, taking into consideration California’s diverse landscapes and community characteristics.

(History: Added by Stats. 2018, Ch. 15, Sec. 7.   (AB 1668)   Effective January 1, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

10609.8.

(a) The department, in coordination with the board, shall conduct necessary studies and investigations and recommend, no later than October 1, 2021, standards for outdoor irrigation of landscape areas with dedicated irrigation meters or other means of calculating outdoor irrigation use in connection with CII water use for adoption by the board in accordance with this chapter.
